Hawaii, session 2026, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 281-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (k) to read as follows: "(k) Class 11.  Cabaret license.  A cabaret license shall be general only but shall exclude alcohol and shall authorize the sale of liquor for consumption on the premises.  A cabaret license shall be issued only for premises where food is served, facilities for dancing by the patrons including a dance floor are provided, and live or amplified recorded music or professional entertainment, except professional entertainment by a person who performs or entertains unclothed, is provided for the patrons; provided that professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall be authorized by: (1)  A cabaret license for premises where professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed was presented on a regular and consistent basis immediately prior to June 15, 1990; or (2)  A cabaret license that, pursuant to rules adopted by the liquor commission, permits professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed. A cabaret license under paragraph (1) or (2) authorizing professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall be transferable through June 30, 2000.  A cabaret license under paragraph (1) or (2) authorizing professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall not be transferable after June 30, 2000, except upon approval by the liquor commission and pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.  Notwithstanding any rule of the liquor commission to the contrary, cabarets in resort areas may be opened for the transaction of business until 4 a.m. throughout the entire week.  A cabaret license shall not be issued for any premises located within an apartment mixed use subprecinct within a [special improvement or] special district [in which the economy is primarily based on tourism.] or special improvement district." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________